Utah statutes.
75-5-433.   Embezzlement of protected person's estate -- Citation to person suspected.

Upon petition made by any interested person against anyone suspected of having concealed, embezzled, or conveyed away any of the money, goods or effects, or an instrument in writing, belonging to the protected person, ward, or to his estate, the court may cite the suspected person to appear before it and may examine and proceed with him on the charge; and if on such examination it appears that he has wrongful possession of any such property, the court may order the delivery of the same to the conservator or guardian.



Amended by Chapter 194, 1977 General Session

